Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-910
Medical assistance payments; source of funds.

(1) Medical assistance shall be paid from General Funds, cash funds, federal funds, and such other funds as may qualify for federal matching funds under federal law. General Fund appropriations for the program shall be based on an assessment by the Legislature of General Fund revenue and the competing needs of other state-funded programs.

(2) Medical assistance paid on behalf of eligible recipients may include, but is not limited to, (a) direct payments to vendors under a fee-for-service, managed care, or other provider contract, (b) premium payments, deductibles, and coinsurance for private health insurance coverage, employer-sponsored coverage, catastrophic health insurance coverage, or long-term care insurance coverage, and (c) payments to providers who serve eligible recipients of medical assistance or low-income uninsured persons and meet federal and state disproportionate-share payment requirements.

(3) Medical assistance shall not be paid directly to eligible recipients.

Laws 1965, c. 397, § 7, p. 1278;

Laws 1967, c. 410, § 2, p. 1274;

Laws 1979, LB 138, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 39, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 42;

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 24;

Laws 1986, LB 1253, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1022;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 10.